Illinois, session 104th, HB3989.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Premise Alert Program (PAP) Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 132/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Premise Alert Program (PAP) Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-788, eff. 8-28-09.)